North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 4A. Political Activities by State Board and County Board of Elections Members and Employees.

§ 163-38.
Applicability of Article.

This Article applies to members and employees of the State Board of Elections and of each county board of elections. With regard to prohibitions in this Article concerning candidates, referenda, and committees, the prohibitions do not apply if the candidate
or referendum will not be on the ballot in an area within the jurisdiction of the board, or if the political committee or referendum committee is not involved with an election or referendum that will be on the ballot in an area within
the jurisdiction of the board.

History.
2000-114, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 14(a); 2011-31, s. 17; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-39.
Limitation on political activities.

No individual subject to this Article shall:

Make written or oral statements intended for general distribution or dissemination to the public at large supporting or opposing the nomination or election of one or more clearly identified candidates for public office.

Make written or oral statements intended for general distribution or dissemination to the public at large supporting or opposing the passage of one or more clearly identified referendum proposals.

Solicit contributions for a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee.

Individual expressions of opinion, support, or opposition not intended for general public distribution shall not be deemed a violation of this Article. Nothing in this Article shall be deemed to prohibit participation in a political party convention as
a delegate. Nothing in this Article shall be deemed to prohibit a board member or board employee from making a contribution to a candidate, political committee, or referendum committee. Nothing in this Article shall be deemed
to prohibit a board member or board employee from advising other government entities as to technical matters related to election administration or revision of electoral district boundaries.

History.
2000-114, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 14(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-40.
Violation may be ground for removal.

A violation of this Article may be a ground to remove a State Board of Elections member under

G.S. 143B-16

or a county board of elections member under G.S. 163-22(c). A violation of this Article may be a ground for dismissal of an employee of the State Board of Elections or of a county board of elections. No criminal penalty
shall be imposed for a violation of this Article.

History.
2000-114, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 14(a); 2011-31, s. 18; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-40.1.
Definitions.

The provisions of Article 22A of this Chapter apply to the definition and proof of terms used in this Article.

History.
2000-114, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Cross References.

For definition sections in Article 23 of Chapter 163A, see 163A-1411, 163A-1475, and 163A-1495.